trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="and/en__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="disse__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   </pardef>
    
     <pardef n="d/enne__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enne</l>
          <r>enne<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ette</l>
          <r>enne<s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="begge__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="in/gen__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tet</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>genting</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="der__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="år__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~ene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bold__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~e / ~ene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cirk/el__n"> <!-- Common; ~el / ~len / ~ler / ~lerne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kat__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~ten / ~te / ~tene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="spil__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~let / ~ / ~lene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nød__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~den / ~der / ~derne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abe__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / ~r / ~rne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hus__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~e / ~ene; Remember genitive is "hus'". Only to bed used with nouns that end in "s". If not, use vand__n -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ateist__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="der"><i>der</i><par n="der__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="som"><i>som</i><par n="der__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="anden"><i>and</i><par n="and/en__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="disse"><i>disse</i><par n="disse__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="denne"><i>d</i><par n="d/enne__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="begge"><i>begge</i><par n="begge__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hinanden"><i>hinanden</i><par n="begge__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ingen"><i>in</i><par n="in/gen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="blondine"><i>blondine</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bommert"><i>bommert</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centralsygehus"><i>centralsygehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dørkarm"><i>dørkarm</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="erhvervsliv"><i>erhvervsliv</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eskadrechef"><i>eskadrechef</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="estrade"><i>estrade</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firetageshus"><i>firetageshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gnavpotte"><i>gnavpotte</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helårshus"><i>helårshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hovedbund"><i>hovedbund</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hustru"><i>hustru</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kreditkort"><i>kreditkort</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kridthus"><i>kridthus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kulbrinte"><i>kulbrinte</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="median"><i>median</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nød"><i>nød</i><par n="nød__n"/></e>
    <e lm="p-hus"><i>p-hus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="portvin"><i>portvin</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="relatering"><i>relatering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="signalhorn"><i>signalhorn</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skulde"><i>skulde</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søhest"><i>søhest</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="straffeattest"><i>straffeattest</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styrehus"><i>styrehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tankangreb"><i>tankangreb</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troldeskov"><i>troldeskov</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="absorptionsevne"><i>absorptionsevne</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="livsnerve"><i>livsnerve</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feriegiro"><i>feriegiro</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bid"><i>bid</i><par n="nød__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dolk"><i>dolk</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medarbejderfond"><i>medarbejderfond</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udbetalingsdag"><i>udbetalingsdag</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antikvarboghand"><i>antikvarboghand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bimp"><i>bimp</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyk"><i>cyk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fist"><i>fist</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirt"><i>kirt</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meritoverførs"><i>meritoverførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skærmyds"><i>skærmyds</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hals"><i>hals</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ba"><i>ba</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bølleha"><i>bølleha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filtha"><i>filtha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="huska"><i>huska</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parasolha"><i>parasolha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skva"><i>skva</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tamka"><i>tamka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boldspi"><i>boldspi</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dumpningsta"><i>dumpningsta</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gæstespi"><i>gæstespi</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krybbespi"><i>krybbespi</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oktanta"><i>oktanta</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rollespi"><i>rollespi</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terningspi"><i>terningspi</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bådehus"><i>bådehus</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enkeltord"><i>enkeltord</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="misbrug"><i>misbrug</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tilfældighedspræg"><i>tilfældighedspræg</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
